Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-406
Mayor; recommendations to city council.

The mayor of a city of the primary class shall from time to time communicate to the city council such recommendations or information as in his or her opinion tend to improve the finances, police, health, comfort, and general welfare of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 24, p. 78;

R.S.1913, § 4515;

C.S.1922, § 3901;

C.S.1929, § 15-406;

R.S.1943, § 15-406;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 102.
November 14, 2020